Florida, session 2026, HB1283.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and subsection
(4) of section 112.532, Florida Statutes, are amended, and
subsection (8) is added to that section, to read:
112.532 Law enforcement officers' and correctional
officers' rights.—All law enforcement officers and correctional
officers employed by or appointed to a law enforcement agency or
a correctional agency shall have the following rights and
privileges:
(1) RIGHTS OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS WHILE UNDER INVESTIGATION.—Whenever a law enforcement
officer or correctional officer is under investigation and
subject to interrogation by members of his or her agency for any
reason that could lead to disciplinary action, suspension,
demotion, or dismissal, the interrogation must be conducted
under the following conditions:
(d) The law enforcement officer or correctional officer
under investigation must be informed of the nature of the
investigation and the names of all complainants and must be
provided with a copy of the complaint, signed by the complainant
under oath, before any interrogation begins, and he or she must
be informed of the names of all complainants. However, if a
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1283-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1283 2026
complaint is accompanied by corroborating evidence, the
complainant names and a signature are not required. All
identifiable witnesses shall be interviewed, whenever possible,
prior to the beginning of the investigative interview of the
accused officer. The complaint, all witness statements,
including all other existing subject officer statements, and all
other existing evidence, including, but not limited to, incident
reports, GPS locator information, and audio or video recordings
relating to the incident under investigation, must be provided
to each officer who is the subject of the complaint before the
beginning of any investigative interview of that officer. An
officer, after being informed of the right to review witness
statements, may voluntarily waive the provisions of this
paragraph and provide a voluntary statement at any time.
(4) NOTICE OF DISCIPLINARY ACTION; COPY OF AND OPPORTUNITY
TO ADDRESS CONTENTS OF INVESTIGATIVE FILE; CONFIDENTIALITY.—
(a) A dismissal, demotion, transfer, reassignment, or
other personnel action that might result in loss of pay or
benefits or that might otherwise be considered a punitive
measure may not be taken against any law enforcement officer or
correctional officer unless the law enforcement officer or
correctional officer is notified of the action and the reason or
reasons for the action and is provided with a copy of the
complaint, signed by the complainant under oath, unless the
exception in paragraph (1)(d) applies, before the effective date
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1283-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1283 2026
of the action.
(b) Notwithstanding s. 112.533(5), whenever a law
enforcement officer or correctional officer is subject to
disciplinary action consisting of suspension with loss of pay,
demotion, or dismissal, the officer or the officer's
representative must, upon request, be provided with a complete
copy of the investigative file, including the complaint signed
by the complainant under oath, the final investigative report,
and all evidence, and with the opportunity to address the
findings in the report with the employing law enforcement agency
before imposing disciplinary action consisting of suspension
with loss of pay, demotion, or dismissal. The contents of the
complaint and investigation must remain confidential until such
time as the employing law enforcement agency makes a final
determination whether to issue a notice of disciplinary action
consisting of suspension with loss of pay, demotion, or
dismissal. This paragraph does not provide law enforcement
officers with a property interest or expectancy of continued
employment, employment, or appointment as a law enforcement
officer.
(8) RIGHTS OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS AFTER AN INVESTIGATION.—The investigative file produced
during an investigation of a law enforcement or correctional
officer, which investigation does not result in the imposition
100 of disciplinary action on the officer, must be included in the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1283-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1283 2026
101 personnel file of such officer. An investigation of a law
102 enforcement officer or correctional officer which does not
103 result in the imposition of disciplinary action on the officer
104 does not affect the ability of such officer to receive a
105 promotion, a raise, or any other commendation.
106 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
107 112.533, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
108 112.533 Receipt and processing of complaints.—
109 (4)(a) Every law enforcement agency and correctional
110 agency shall establish and put into operation a system for the
111 receipt, investigation, and determination of complaints received
112 by such agency from any person, which must be the procedure for
113 investigating a complaint against a law enforcement or
114 correctional officer and for determining whether to proceed with
115 disciplinary action or to file disciplinary charges,
116 notwithstanding any other law or ordinance to the contrary. A
117 complaint against a law enforcement or correctional officer must
118 be in writing and be signed under oath as provided in s.
119 92.525(2) by the person filing the complaint, except as provided
120 in s. 112.532(1)(d). A complainant who makes a false complaint
121 is subject to the penalties in s. 92.525(3). When law
122 enforcement or correctional agency personnel assigned the
123 responsibility of investigating the complaint prepare an
124 investigative report or summary, regardless of form, the person
125 preparing the report shall, at the time the report is completed:
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1283-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1283 2026
126 1. Verify pursuant to s. 92.525 that the contents of the
127 report are true and accurate based upon the person's personal
128 knowledge, information, and belief.
129 2. Include the following statement, sworn and subscribed
130 to pursuant to s. 92.525:
131
132 "I, the undersigned, do hereby swear, under penalty of perjury,
133 that, to the best of my personal knowledge, information, and
134 belief, I have not knowingly or willfully deprived, or allowed
135 another to deprive, the subject of the investigation of any of
136 the rights contained in ss. 112.532 and 112.533, Florida
137 Statutes."
138
139 The requirements of subparagraphs 1. and 2. must be completed
140 before the determination as to whether to proceed with
141 disciplinary action or to file disciplinary charges. This
142 subsection does not preclude the Criminal Justice Standards and
143 Training Commission from exercising its authority under chapter
144 943.
145 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1283-01-c1